Utah statutes.
78B-9-110.   Appeal -- Jurisdiction.

Any party may appeal from the trial court's final judgment on a petition for post-conviction relief to the appellate court having jurisdiction pursuant to Section 78A-3-102 or 78A-4-103.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

